Utah statutes.
65A-11-1.   Authority of division to control and prevent floods.

(1)  The division may authorize surveys of any state lands or other areas of the state for the purpose of controlling and preventing floods.

(2)  If after a survey the division concludes that floods are likely to affect any state lands, and will endanger life, health, or property, then the division shall take action necessary to control or to prevent the occurrence of those floods.

(3)  For the purpose of controlling and preventing floods, the division may cooperate with public and private entities.

(4)  The division may authorize construction of necessary control works on a basis of equitable participation and for these purposes may acquire any additional lands, necessary for the control or the prevention of the floods, either by purchase, exchange, lease, condemnation, or gift.

(5)  The division may transfer these lands to any existing agencies or agencies created to maintain prevention or control works.

(6)  The division may cooperate with the federal government in acquiring watershed lands becoming barren and susceptible to flooding.



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 294, 1994 General Session

